Utah statutes.
26-21-203.   Department authorized to grant, deny, or revoke clearance -- Department may limit direct patient access.

(1)  As provided in Section 26-21-204, the department may grant, deny, or revoke clearance for an individual, including a covered individual.

(2)  The department may limit the circumstances under which a covered individual granted clearance may have direct patient access, based on the relationship the factors under Subsection 26-21-204(4)(a) and other mitigating factors may have to patient and resident protection.



Enacted by Chapter 328, 2012 General Session

